Idaho, session 2025, H0384.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That the Heading for Chapter 24, Title 41, Idaho Code, be,
and the same is hereby amended to read as follows:
CHAPTER 24
PROPERTY INSURANCE CONTRACTS
SECTION 2. That Chapter 24, Title 41, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 41-2402, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
41-2402. IDAHO WILDFIRE RISK MITIGATION FUND ACT -- LEGISLATIVE IN-
TENT -- SHORT TITLE. It is the intent of the legislature to assist homeowners
and property owners in protecting their homes and property against wildfire
risks and to reduce or mitigate wildfire risk to property owners, thereby re-
ducing costs of property insurance, reducing or mitigating community-level
wildfire risks, and assisting in attracting and retaining insurers in the
property marketplace, by establishing the provisions of sections 41-2402
through 41-2405, Idaho Code, which shall be known and may be cited as the
"Idaho Wildfire Risk Mitigation Fund Act."
SECTION 3. That Chapter 24, Title 41, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 41-2403, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
41-2403. WILDFIRE RISK MITIGATION FUND. (1) There is hereby created in
the state treasury the wildfire risk mitigation fund. The fund shall con-
sist of moneys deposited pursuant to section 41-2405, Idaho Code. Inter-
est earned on the investment of idle moneys in the fund shall be returned to
the fund. The fund is hereby continuously appropriated to the extent neces-


sary to accomplish the provisions of sections 41-2402 through 41-2405, Idaho
Code.
(2) The fund is established to:
(a) Receive funding from various sources;
(b) Improve access to property insurance in target areas; and
(c) Distribute funding to mitigate wildfire risk, including but not
limited to grants, matching programs, and educational efforts.
(3) The fund shall, at all times, be free from taxation of any kind.
(4) The director of the department of insurance may appoint an advisory
committee to assist in operation of the fund.
SECTION 4. That Chapter 24, Title 41, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 41-2404, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
41-2404. POWERS AND AUTHORITY. The director of the department of in-
surance shall have the authority to:
(1) Promulgate rules, subject to legislative approval, to accomplish
the provisions of sections 41-2402 through 41-2405, Idaho Code; and
(2) Establish policies and procedures as may be necessary or convenient
for the implementation of the provision of sections 41-2402 through 41-2405,
Idaho Code, and the operation of the wildfire risk mitigation fund, includ-
ing for:
(a) The handling and accounting of assets and moneys and for the annual
fiscal reporting of such assets and moneys;
(b) Selecting an administrator and setting forth the powers and duties
of the administrator;
(c) Providing grants to citizens or communities for wildfire risk mit-
igation. Such grant amounts shall be limited in order to assist the
largest number of citizens and may require matching funds; and
(d) Funding property protection and fire prevention and mitigation ed-
ucation and resources.
SECTION 5. That Chapter 24, Title 41, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 41-2405, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
41-2405. FUNDING. The Idaho wildfire risk mitigation fund shall be
funded from the following sources:
(1) The ongoing appropriation of premium tax authorized pursuant to
section 41-406(1)(e), Idaho Code;
(2) Excess stamping fees as recommended by the surplus line association
of Idaho or a delegated organization and approved by the director of the de-
partment of insurance; and
(3) Grants or other contributions available for fire prevention or mit-
igation, including private sector contributions.
SECTION 6. That Section 41-406, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:


41-406. DEPOSIT AND REPORT OF FEES, LICENSES AND TAXES. (1) The direc-
tor shall transmit all taxes, fines and penalties collected by him to the
state treasurer as provided under section 59-1014, Idaho Code. The director
shall file with the state controller a statement of each deposit thus made.
All such funds received shall be deposited into the department of insurance
suspense account. Such funds shall be distributed as follows:
(a) The director may deposit up to twenty percent (20%) of the funds
received in the insurance refund account which is hereby created for
the purpose of repaying overpayments of any taxes, fines, and penalties
or other erroneous receipts. There is hereby appropriated out of the
insurance refund account so much thereof as shall be necessary for the
payment of refunds. Any unencumbered balance remaining in the insur-
ance refund account on June 30 of each and every year in excess of forty
thousand dollars ($40,000) shall be transferred to the general fund and
the state controller is hereby authorized and directed on such dates to
make such transfers unless the board of examiners, which is hereby au-
thorized to do so, changes the date of transfer or sum to be transferred.
(b) That portion of the premium tax, payable to the public employee re-
tirement fund as provided in section 59-1394, Idaho Code, shall be dis-
tributed to that fund.
(c) That portion of the premium tax necessary to cover administrative
costs incurred by the department in placing insurance companies or any
other insurance entities into receivership or under administrative su-
pervision, and such costs cannot be satisfied from the assets of these
companies or entities, shall be distributed to the insurance insolvency
administrative fund which is hereby created. There is hereby appro-
priated out of the insurance insolvency administrative fund so much
thereof as shall be necessary, but not to exceed two hundred thousand
dollars ($200,000) in any one (1) fiscal year, for the payment of the
department's administrative expenses incurred in carrying out such re-
ceiverships or supervision. A balance of one hundred thousand dollars
($100,000) shall be maintained in this fund on June 30 of each year.
(d) After all other the deductions authorized in this section
paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection have been made, if the pre-
mium tax remaining exceeds forty-five million dollars ($45,000,000),
one-fourth (1/4) of such excess is hereby appropriated and shall be paid
to the Idaho individual high risk reinsurance pool established in chap-
ter 55, title 41, Idaho Code.
(e) After the deductions authorized in paragraphs (b) through (d) of
this subsection have been made, if the premium tax remaining exceeds
one hundred thirteen million dollars ($113,000,000), one-fourth (1/4)
of such excess is hereby appropriated and shall be paid to the wildfire
risk mitigation fund established in chapter 24, title 41, Idaho Code.
(e) (f) The balance of the premium tax, fines and penalties shall be
distributed to the general fund of the state of Idaho.
(f) (g) All moneys received for fees, licenses and miscellaneous
charges collected shall be distributed to the insurance administrative
account.


(2) The director shall make and file with the state controller an item-
ized statement of the fees, licenses, taxes, fines and penalties collected
by him during the preceding month.
SECTION 7. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.